Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-109
Nebraska State Historical Society; documents relating to General Land Office; agreement with United States Land Office.

The Nebraska State Historical Society is authorized to enter into an agreement with the General Land Office at Washington, D.C., for the reception, preservation, organization and arrangement for public use of all documents relating to the former United States Land Offices in Nebraska that may be transferred from the custody of the General Land Office at Washington, D.C., to the custody of the society.

Laws 1937, c. 196, § 1, p. 818;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 82-114;

R.S.1943, § 82-109.